Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 11. Restrictions on Speed; Use of Radar.

§ 63-3-501.
Maximum speed limits on state, interstate and controlled access highways; maximum speed limit on toll roads.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall operate a vehicle on the highways of the state at a speed greater than sixty-five (65) miles per hour.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may, in its discretion, by order duly entered on its minutes, increase the speed restrictions on any portion of the Interstate Highway System provided such speed restrictions are not increased to more than seventy (70) miles per hour. The commission may likewise increase the speed limit to seventy (70) miles per hour on controlled access highways with four (4) or more lanes.

A governmental entity that operates and maintains a toll road as authorized under Section 65-43-1, or that contracts with some person or business to operate and maintain a toll road as authorized under Section 65-43-3, may establish the maximum speed for motor vehicles operated on any such toll road; however, the maximum speed so established may not exceed eighty (80) miles per hour.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 318; Laws, 1996, ch 303, § 1; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 63-3-502.
Penalties for conviction of driving motor vehicle or motorcycle on street or highway in a race.

For the purposes of this section:

“Motor vehicle” has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3.

“Motorcycle” has the meaning ascribed in Section 27-19-3.

“Street” or “highway” means the entire width between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.

Any person driving a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon a street or highway in a race, upon conviction, shall be punished as follows:

A person convicted for the first offense of violating this subsection shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than forty-eight (48) hours, or both.

For a second conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be fined not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) days nor more than one (1) year, and shall be sentenced to community service work for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year.

(i) For a third or subsequent conviction of any person violating this subsection, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and shall serve not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections; however, for any such offense that does not result in serious injury or death to any person, the sentence of incarceration may be served in the county jail at the discretion of the circuit court judge.

After a conviction under this subsection and upon receipt of the court abstract, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall suspend the driver’s license and driving privileges of the person for not less than five (5) years.

A conviction and imposition of a sentence under this section does not prevent a conviction and imposition of a sentence under Section 63-7-103.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-3-503.
Modification of maximum speed limits by state highway commission; maximum penalties for violations.

Whenever the state highway commission shall determine upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that any speed set forth in Section 63-3-501 is greater than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at any intersection or other place or upon any part of a highway, said commission shall determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit thereat which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at such intersection or other place or part of highway.

Whenever the state highway commission determines that speed limits set forth in Section 63-3-501 are different from those speeds set forth in applicable laws of the Federal Government, then said commission may declare a speed limit which is consistent with such laws and which shall be effective immediately upon adoption by the commission. Appropriate signs giving notice of the adopted speed limits shall be erected upon order of the commission.

The maximum fine and sentence to be imposed for a violation of excessive speed above the maximum limits set by the state highway commission pursuant to the authority granted by this section shall be one-half (1/2) the fine and sentence imposed by Section 63-9-11 if the excessive speed does not exceed the maximum limits imposed by Section 63-3-501.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 314, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 28, 1974).

§ 63-3-505.
Conditions under which speed must be decreased.

The driver or operator of any motor vehicle must decrease speed when approaching and crossing an intersection, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, or when special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or other traffic. All trucks, or truck-trailer combinations and passenger buses shall be required to reduce speed to forty-five miles per hour during inclement weather when visibility is bad.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1 eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 63-3-507.
Details of complaint and summons or notice to appear alleging speeding violation.

In every charge of violation of Sections 63-3-501 through 63-3-505, and subsection (2) of Section 63-3-509 the complaint as well as the summons or notice to appear, shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven as well as the speed applicable within the district or at the location.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 63-3-509.
Minimum speed limits.

No motor vehicle shall be driven at a speed less than thirty miles per hour on federal designated highways where no hazard exists. An exception to this requirement shall be recognized when reduced speed is necessary for safe operation, or when a vehicle or combination of vehicles is necessarily, or in compliance with law or police direction, proceeding at a reduced speed.

Police officers are hereby authorized to enforce this provision by directions to drivers. In the event of apparent wilful disobedience to this provision and refusal to comply with the direction of an officer in accordance herewith the continued slow operation by a driver shall be a misdemeanor.

In the event a speed limit of seventy miles per hour is established on any portion of the Interstate Highway System or on four-laned U.S. designated highways as is provided in Section 63-3-501, a minimum speed of forty miles per hour shall be established for those vehicles having a maximum speed restriction of seventy miles per hour. Notice of said minimum speed shall be posted on such roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8176, 8178; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, §§ 1, 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 524; Laws, 1966, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 442, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1970).

§ 63-3-511.
Modification of speed limits by local authorities; establishment of speed limits upon roads of correctional facilities; modification of local limits to conform to lower limits established by state highway commission.

Whenever local authorities, including boards of supervisors, within their respective jurisdictions, determine upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that the speed permitted under this article on any street, or any county road or any portion thereof, or at any intersection is greater than is reasonable or safe under conditions found to exist upon such street, or any county road or any portion thereof, or at such intersection, such local authorities shall determine and declare, by ordinance, a reasonable and safe speed limit, which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected on such street, or any county road or any portion thereof, or at such intersection, or upon the approaches thereto. However, no speed limit shall be fixed by any such local authorities at less than fifteen (15) miles per hour.

The Commissioner of Corrections is authorized to establish by regulation reasonable and safe speed limits upon the roads of the correctional facilities under his jurisdiction which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected. Speed limits may be based upon road or traffic conditions or upon security considerations.

Provided, however, that whenever the State Highway Commission shall, pursuant to Section 63-3-503, lower the maximum speed limit in response to federal laws, regulations or guidelines for purposes of energy conservation, local authorities, including boards of supervisors, shall immediately lower maximum speed limits on local highways, not to exceed a maximum speed of fifty-five (55) miles per hour.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8177; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 397; Laws, 1960, ch. 208; Laws, 1974, ch. 321; Laws, 1986, ch. 485, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 63-3-513.
Special speed limitation on bridges and elevated structures; proof of violations.

The state highway commission upon request from any local authority shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and if it shall thereupon find that such structure cannot with safety to itself withstand vehicles traveling at the speed otherwise permissible under this article, the commission shall determine and declare the maximum speed of vehicles which such structure can withstand, and shall cause or permit suitable signs stating such maximum speed to be erected and maintained at a distance of one hundred feet before each end of such structure.

No person shall drive a vehicle over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure, when such structure is signposted as provided in this section.

Upon the trial of any person, charged with a violation of this section, proof of said determination of the maximum speed by said commission and the existence of said signs shall constitute conclusive evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8179; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-515.
Speed limits near schools and churches, upon levees and causeways, and in other designated special zones.

The boards of supervisors of counties and the governing authorities of municipalities are hereby authorized to adopt by order or resolution and to enforce within their respective territorial boundaries the maximum legal rate of speed at which a motor vehicle may be run or operated along any public street, road, highway (except state-maintained highways), or portion thereof in the vicinity of schools and churches, upon levees and causeways and in other special zones which the board or governing authorities may designate. The rate of speed so established shall be determined upon the basis of an engineering and traffic study. The order or resolution setting such speed limits may provide that such limits are only effective during specified times of the day, days of the week and months of the year.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5776; 1930, § 5570; 1942, § 8060; Laws, 1916, ch. 116; Laws, 1986, ch. 353, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 63-3-516.
Speed limits within highway work zones; penalties for violations.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle within a highway work zone at a speed in excess of the maximum speed limit specifically established for the zone whenever workers are present and whenever the zone is indicated by appropriately placed signs displaying the reduced maximum speed limit. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished, upon conviction, for a first offense by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); and for second, third and subsequent offenses by a fine of double the maximum fine imposed for second, third or subsequent offenses under Section 63-9-11.

For the purposes of this section the term “highway work zone” means a construction or maintenance area that is located on or along any public highway, road or street within this state that is marked:

By appropriate warning signs or other traffic control devices indicating that work is in progress; and

By signs of a design approved by the Department of Transportation indicating that any person who operates a motor vehicle within a highway work zone at a speed in excess of the reduced maximum speed limit may be punished by a fine of double the maximum amount otherwise authorized by law.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the prosecution or conviction for careless or reckless driving of any motor vehicle operator whose operation of a motor vehicle in a highway work zone, apart from speed, demonstrates the operation of the same in a careless or imprudent manner in violation of Section 63-3-1213 or in a reckless manner in violation of Section 63-3-1201.

Every person who operates any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this section and who causes property damage to road construction equipment or a motor vehicle in an amount of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or greater within a highway work zone shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a separate misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court, and the court shall, as a condition of any sentence imposed determine the extent of the property damage caused by the violator and require the violator to make restitution to the injured party upon such terms and conditions determined by the court. Nothing herein however shall prevent the injured party from pursuing any other civil remedies against the violators as allowed by law.

Every person who operates any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this section and who causes the death of another within a highway work zone or mutilates, disfigures, permanently disables or destroys the tongue, eye, lip, nose or any other limb, organ or member of another within a highway work zone shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a separate felony for each victim who suffers death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury and shall be committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a period of time of not less than three (3) years and not to exceed fifteen (15) years for each death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury, and the imprisonment for the second or each subsequent conviction, in the discretion of the court, shall commence either at the termination of the imprisonment for the preceding conviction or run concurrently with the preceding conviction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004; Laws, 2019, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

Joint Legislative Committee Note—

Pursuant to
Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected errors in this section by deleting the paragraph designator “a” following the subsection (4) and (5) designators. Section 2 of Chapter 356, Laws of 2019, amended this section by adding paragraphs designated (a) in subsections (4) and (5) but did not add any other designated paragraphs in the subsections. The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 12, 2019, meeting.

§ 63-3-517.
Applicability of speed restrictions to emergency vehicles; duties of drivers of emergency vehicles.

The speed limitations set forth in this article shall not apply to authorized emergency vehicles when responding to emergency calls and the drivers thereof sound audible signal by bell, siren, or exhaust whistle. This section shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the street, nor shall it protect the driver of any such vehicle from the consequence of a reckless disregard of the safety of others.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8180; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 4.

§ 63-3-519.
Use of radar speed detection equipment; authorization and limitations.

It shall be unlawful for any person or peace officer or law enforcement agency, except the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, to purchase or use or allow to be used any type of radar speed detection equipment upon any public street, road or highway of this state. However, such equipment may be used:

1. By municipal law enforcement officers within a municipality having a population of two thousand (2,000) or more upon the public streets of the municipality;

2. By any college or university campus police force within the confines of any campus wherein more than two thousand (2,000) students are enrolled;

3. By municipal law enforcement officers in any municipality having a population in excess of fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the latest federal census on federally designated highways lying within the corporate limits.

The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol will not set up radar on highways within municipalities with a population in excess of fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the latest federal census.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 383, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 542, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1968).

§ 63-3-521.
Use of radar speed detection equipment; penalties for violations.

Any person who violates section 63-3-519 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8176.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 383, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 542, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1968).